Hawaii statutes.
[§523A-28] Transitional provisions.
(a) An initial report filed under this part for property that was not required
to be reported before July 1, 2009 but which is subject to this part shall
include all items of property that would have been presumed abandoned during
the ten-year period next preceding July 1, 2009 as if this part had been in
effect during that period.

(b) This part does not relieve a holder of a
duty that arose before July 1, 2009 to report, pay, or deliver property.
Except as otherwise provided in section 523A-19(b), a holder who did not
comply with the law in effect before July 1, 2009 shall be subject to the
applicable provisions for enforcement and penalties which then existed, which
are continued in effect for the purpose of this section. [L 2008, c 55, pt of
§1]

Revision Note

"July 1, 2009" substituted for "the effective
date of this chapter".

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next